Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.040

Licenses.

(1) The secretary shall license as a physical therapist, and shall furnish a license to, each applicant who successfully passes the examination for licensure as a physical therapist.

(2) The secretary shall license as a physical therapist assistant, and shall furnish a license to, each applicant who successfully passes the examination for licensure as a physical therapist assistant.

[ 2007 c 98 s 5; 1991 c 3 s 177; 1983 c 116 s 8; 1949 c 239 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10163-4.]